Maine, session 132, LD940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12504, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2013, c. 358, §5, is
further amended to read:
B. Fixing the maximum total value of prizes that may be awarded at each derby, except
that for a derby 2 derbies, one held on Sebago Lake in Cumberland County and in
conjunction with the department's fisheries management objectives the Long Lake Ice
Fishing Derby held in northern Aroostook County, the maximum total value of prizes
at each derby may not exceed $100,000. These derbies must be conducted in such a
manner as to be consistent with the department's fisheries management objectives.
Page 1 - 132LR1209(03)